Missouri, session 2026, HB12.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 2
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated, for the period
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as follows:
Section 12.000. An appropriation may be comprised in whole or in part
of a one-time amount, and such one-time amount shall be
construed to be a component part of, and not in addition to, the
stated appropriation amount. Any amount of an appropriation
identified as “one-time” in this act shall not be considered an
addition to any ongoing core appropriation(s) in future fiscal
periods beyond June 30, 2026. Any amount identified as one-time
may, however, be requested in any future fiscal period as a new
decision item.
Section 12.005. To the Governor
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,193,283
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Administrative Fund
(1122) ....................................................................................................................45,441
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..................................................3,041
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274) .....................................22,786
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ............................................................................6,134
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) .........................................................................36,308
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) .........................................16,022
From Department of Commerce and Industry Administrative Fund (1503) ....................12,342
From Department of Economic Development Administrative Fund (1547) ....................28,231
From Division of Finance Fund (1550) ..............................................................................5,889
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566) .............................................................................9,941
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689) ...........................................................35,958
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ........................................................................33,136
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment for the Mansion
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 318,707
Total (Not to exceed 37.50 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$4,767,219
Section 12.010. To the Governor
For expenses incident to emergency duties performed by the National
Guard when ordered out by the governor, provided one hundred

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 3
percent (100%) flexibility of unneeded funding is allowed
between this section and Section 12.020
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,000,001
Section 12.015. To the Governor
For conducting special audits
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$30,000
Section 12.020. To the Governor
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Agriculture Disaster Resiliency Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Section 12.025. To the Lieutenant Governor
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$820,811
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Arts Council Trust Fund (1262) ...............................................................41,233
For a library and museum, located in a city with more than one hundred
five thousand but fewer than one hundred twenty-five thousand
inhabitants, which promotes awareness and presidents from
Missouri
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 2,500,000
Total (Not to exceed 7.00 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$3,362,044
Section 12.030. To the Lieutenant Governor
For the Missouri State Council on the Arts, provided that ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Economic Development – Missouri Council on the
Arts Federal Fund (1138) ...............................................................................$1,205,378
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,206,144
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 8,912,808
From Missouri Arts Council Trust Fund (1262) ........................................................10,118,952

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 4
For grants to public television and radio stations as provided in Section
143.183, RSMo
From Missouri Public Broadcasting Corporation Special Fund (1887) .....................2,101,667
For the Missouri Humanities Council
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Humanities Council Trust Fund (1177) ..............................................2,101,667
For a museum located in a city not within a county that collects,
preserves, and shares the stories, culture, and history of black
people with a focus on those with a regional connection to a city
not within a county
From Missouri Humanities Council Trust Fund (1177) .................................................150,000
For non-profit organization located in any city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county that has a demonstrated record of putting on operatic
performances for infrastructure for additional productions to
create greater sustainability and acquisition or creation of
additional operatic productions, sets and other intellectual
property
From Missouri Humanities Council Trust Fund (1177) (one-time) ............................1,000,000
For a museum that commemorates the contributions of African
Americans to the sport of baseball
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Humanities Council Trust Fund (1177) (including $1,500,000
one-time) ..........................................................................................................2,000,000
For a Historical Education Center associated with a museum that
commemorates the contributions of African-Americans to the
sport of baseball
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Humanities Council Trust Fund (1177) (including
$250,000 one-time) .............................................................................................350,000
For an Urban Academy, located within a home rule city with more than
400,000 inhabitants and located in more than one county, which
provides athletic programming targeting underserved youth
From Missouri Humanities Council Trust Fund (1177) .................................................200,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 5
For an orchestra with a commitment to educational and community
outreach efforts, for a performance tour in various locations
throughout Missouri, located in a city not within a county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................2,000,000
For renovations, improvements, and expansion of a museum located in
any city with more than one hundred sixty thousand but fewer
than two hundred thousand inhabitants that is dedicated to
enhancing the education and documenting the diverse cultural
heritage of the people of southwest Missouri
From Missouri Humanities Council Trust Fund (1177) (one-time) ...............................750,000
For grants to non-profit repertory theatres to enhance and expand
services to the communities
From Missouri Humanities Council Trust Fund (1177) (one-time) ............................2,250,000
For capital improvement projects at a museum that commemorates the
life and distinguished career of Sir Winston Churchill, in a city
with more than twelve thousand and five hundred but fewer than
fourteen thousand inhabitants and that is the county seat of a
county with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty
thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue (1101) (one-time) ......................................................................750,000
For a not-for-profit organization located in a city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county, and founded in 2010 which provides space and assistance
to artists of all varieties
From Missouri Humanities Council Trust Fund (1177) (one-time) .................... 250,000
Total (Not to exceed 15.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$25,227,664
Section 12.035. To the Lieutenant Governor
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Missouri Arts Council Trust Fund as authorized by Sections
143.183 and 185.100, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$12,718,923
Section 12.040. To the Lieutenant Governor

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 6
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Missouri Humanities Council Trust Fund as authorized by
Sections 143.183 and 186.065, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $5,500,000 one-time) ....................$9,051,667
Section 12.045. To the Lieutenant Governor
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Missouri Public Broadcasting Corporation Special Fund as
authorized by Section 143.183, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,641,667
Section 12.055. To the Secretary of State
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$11,619,019
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From Election Administration Improvements Fund (1157) ...........................................373,645
From Secretary of State – Federal Fund (1195) ..............................................................505,315
From Secretary of State’s Technology Trust Fund Account (1266) ............................4,656,094
From Local Records Preservation Fund (1577) ..............................................................970,049
From Wolfner Library Trust Fund (1928) ........................................................................30,000
From Investor Education and Protection Fund (1829) ........................................ 1,427,094
Total (Not to exceed 242.30 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$19,581,216
Section 12.060. To the Secretary of State
For the purpose of receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts,
and payments from private, federal, or other governmental
agencies provided that the General Assembly shall be notified of
the source of any new funds and the purpose for which they will
be expended, in writing, prior to the expenditure of said funds
From Secretary of State – Federal Fund (1166) ............................................................$200,000
Section 12.065. To the Secretary of State
For refunds of securities, corporations, uniform commercial code, and
miscellaneous collections of the Secretary of State’s Office
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$50,000
From Secretary of State’s Technology Trust Fund Account (1266) .................... 10,000
Total ................................................................................................................................$60,000
Section 12.070. To the Secretary of State

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 7
For reimbursement to victims of securities fraud and other violations
pursuant to Section 409.6-603, RSMo
From Investor Restitution Fund (1741) .....................................................................$2,000,000
Section 12.075. To the Secretary of State
For expenses of initiative referendum and constitutional amendments
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Section 12.080. To the Secretary of State
For election costs associated with absentee ballots
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$70,000
Section 12.085. To the Secretary of State
For election reform grants, transactions costs, election administration
improvements within Missouri, support of Help America Vote
Act activities, and the state’s share of election costs as required
by Chapter 115, RSMo
From Election Administration Improvements Fund (1157) ....................................$22,350,513
Section 12.090. To the Secretary of State
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Election Administration Improvements Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,284,000
Section 12.095. To the Secretary of State
For historical repository grants
From Secretary of State Records – Federal Fund (1150) ...............................................$50,000
Section 12.100. To the Secretary of State
For local records preservation grants
From Local Records Preservation Fund (1577) ............................................................$400,000
Section 12.105. To the Secretary of State
For preserving legal, historical, and genealogical materials and making
them available to the public
From State Document Preservation Fund (1836) ...........................................................$25,000
Section 12.110. To the Secretary of State
For aid to public libraries
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,504,001

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 8
Section 12.115. To the Secretary of State
For the Remote Electronic Access for Libraries Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,109,250
Section 12.120. To the Secretary of State
For all allotments, grants, and contributions from the federal government
or from any sources that may be deposited in the State Treasury
for the use of the Missouri State Library
From Secretary of State – Federal Fund (1195) .........................................................$4,125,000
Section 12.125. To the Secretary of State
For library networking grants and other grants and donations
From Library Networking Fund (1822) .....................................................................$3,350,000
Section 12.130. To the Secretary of State
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Library
Networking Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,250,000
Section 12.135. To the Secretary of State
For the publication of the Official Manual of Missouri by the University
of Missouri Press, provided that all copies are sold at cost and
proceeds are deposited into the Blue Book Printing Fund
From Blue Book Printing Fund (1471) ...........................................................................$50,000
Section 12.165. To the State Auditor
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$10,648,800
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From State Auditor – Federal Fund (1115)..................................................................2,186,733
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) .................................................................64,703
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ..................................................................................31,490
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ...................................................................30,394
From Petition Audit Revolving Trust Fund (1648) ............................................. 1,081,692
Total (Not to exceed 161.77 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$14,043,812
Section 12.185. To the State Treasurer
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From State Treasurer’s General Operations Fund (1164) ..........................................$3,335,452

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 9
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From Central Check Mailing Service Revolving Fund (1515) .......................................116,062
For Unclaimed Property Division administrative costs including
personal service and expense and equipment for auctions,
advertising, and promotions
From Abandoned Fund Account (1863) ......................................................................2,766,368
For the purpose of awarding scholarship accounts to qualified students
as defined in Section 166.700(9), RSMo., in an order consistent
with the prioritizations delineated in Section 135.714.1(4),
RSMo., in amounts authorized by the formula created under
135.714.1(6), RSMo., through agreements outlined in Section
166.705, RSMo
From Missouri Empowerment Scholarship Accounts Fund (1278) ..........................51,048,917
For preparation and dissemination of information or publications, or for
refunding overpayments
From Treasurer’s Information Fund (1255) ......................................................... 8,000
Total (Not to exceed 54.40 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$57,274,799
Section 12.190. To the State Treasurer
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Missouri Empowerment Scholarship Accounts Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$50,000,000
Section 12.195. To the State Treasurer
For issuing duplicate checks or drafts and outlawed checks as provided
by law
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$13,000,000
Section 12.200. To the State Treasurer
For payment of claims for abandoned property transferred by holders to
the state
From Abandoned Fund Account (1863) ..................................................................$68,000,000
Section 12.205. To the State Treasurer

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 10
For transfer of such sums as may be necessary to make payment of claims
from the Abandoned Fund Account pursuant to Chapter 447,
RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$17,500,000
Section 12.210. To the State Treasurer
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Abandoned Fund Account (1863) ................................................................$108,000,000
Section 12.215. To the State Treasurer
For refunds of excess interest from the Linked Deposit Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................$2,500
Section 12.220. To the State Treasurer
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ........................................................................$250,000
Section 12.225. To the State Treasurer
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Other Funds (Various) ......................................................................................$3,000,000
Section 12.230. To the State Treasurer
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Public School Fund
From Abandoned Fund Account (1863) ....................................................................$5,000,000
Section 12.245. To the Attorney General
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $123,874 one-time) .....................$19,473,738
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From Attorney General – Federal Fund (1136) ...........................................................3,247,718
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ........................................................................180,730
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430) ..........................................................2,052
From Natural Resources Protection Fund-Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ..............................................................................................220,078
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) ...................................................................35,949

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 11
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585) .....................................................35,241
From Motor Vehicle Commission Fund (1588) ...............................................................63,473
From Health Spa Regulatory Fund (1589) ..........................................................................5,000
From Natural Resources Protection Fund-Air Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1594) ................................................................................................34,361
From Attorney General’s Court Costs Fund (1603) .......................................................187,000
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ..................................................................................37,978
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) .....................................................................2,052
From Merchandising Practices Revolving Fund (1631) (including
$16,881 one-time) ............................................................................................6,515,365
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ...................................................................563,397
From Workers’ Compensation - Second Injury Fund (1653) (including
$2,814 one-time) ..............................................................................................3,914,336
From Lottery Enterprise Fund (1657) ...............................................................................76,986
From Groundwater Protection Fund (1660) .......................................................................3,472
From Antitrust Revolving Fund (1666) ..........................................................................753,111
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ..............................................................................205,600
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) ...........................................................................43,358
From Inmate Incarceration Reimbursement Act Revolving Fund (1828) ......................175,992
From Mined Land Reclamation Fund (1906) ...................................................................23,040
For the implementation of the Attorney General's Statewide Council
Against Adult Trafficking and the Commercial Sexual
Exploitation of Children
For the position of the executive director and administrative support for
the statewide council, education and awareness regarding human
trafficking, and anti-trafficking efforts through the state
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From Commercial Sexual Exploitation of Children Awareness and
Education Fund (1726) .......................................................................................900,000
For child and family law and criminal litigation services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 400,000
Total (Not to exceed 360.05 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$37,100,027
Section 12.250. To the Attorney General
For law enforcement, domestic violence, victims’ services, sexual assault
evidence collection, testing, and tracking in collaboration with
the Departments of Public Safety and Social Services through a

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 12
Memorandum of Understanding (MOU), provided that ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
12.245 if the Attorney General receives such grant
From Attorney General – Federal Fund (1136) (Not to exceed 5.00
F.T.E.) ............................................................................................................$3,168,868
Section 12.255. To the Attorney General
For a Violent Crimes Task Force
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 10.00 F.T.E.) ..........................$1,034,086
Section 12.260. To the Attorney General
For a Medicaid fraud unit
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $703 one-time) .................................$849,601
From Attorney General – Federal Fund (1136) (including $2,110
one-time) ..........................................................................................................2,458,532
From MO HealthNet Fraud Prosecution Revolving Fund (1252) ....................... 292,086
Total (Not to exceed 29.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,600,219
Section 12.265. To the Attorney General
For the Missouri Office of Prosecution Services
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$914,039
From Missouri Office of Prosecution Services – Federal Fund (1107) .......................1,236,876
From Missouri Office of Prosecution Services Fund (1680) .......................................2,228,188
From Missouri Office of Prosecution Services Revolving Fund (1844) ........................182,517
For distribution through the Office of Administration to counties
pursuant to Section 56.700, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 143,550
Total (Not to exceed 12.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$4,705,170
Section 12.270. To the Attorney General
For the fulfillment or failure of conditions, or other such developments,
necessary to determine the appropriate disposition of such funds,
to those individuals, entities, or accounts within the State
Treasury, certified by the Attorney General as being entitled to
receive them
From Attorney General Trust Fund (1794) ................................................................$4,000,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 13
Section 12.275. To the Attorney General
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Attorney General’s Court Costs Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$124,200
Section 12.280. To the Attorney General
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Antitrust Revolving Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$51,750
Section 12.282. To the Attorney General
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Commercial Sexual Exploitation of Children Awareness and
Education Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$250,000
Section 12.300. To the Supreme Court
For funding Judicial Proceedings and Review, provided that not more
than twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment, and further
provided that not more than twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility
is allowed between Sections 12.300 through 12.380, excluding
Sections 12.325 and 12.375
Personal Service .............................................................................................$4,144,882
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,107,045
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..........................................................................5,251,927
Personal Service
From Judiciary – Federal Fund (1137) ...........................................................................661,250
Expense and Equipment
From Supreme Court Publications Revolving Fund (1525) ............................... 151,915
Total (Not to exceed 76.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,065,092
Section 12.305. To the Supreme Court
For the salaries of Supreme Court Judges and Chief Justice
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,371,032
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 476.405,
RSMo ....................................................................................................... 24,771

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 14
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 7.00 F.T.E.) ............................$1,395,803
Section 12.310. To the Supreme Court
For funding the State Courts Administrator and implementing and
supporting an integrated case management system, provided
twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment, and further
provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 12.300 through 12.380, excluding Sections
12.325 and 12.375
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$10,633,514
Expense and Equipment (including $2,989,111 one-time) ...................... 13,654,713
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................24,288,227
For a statewide pre-trial pilot program
Personal Service ..................................................................................................374,794
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,378,999
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,753,793
For the preservation of expunged records in accordance with Section 2
of Article XIV of the Constitution of Missouri
Expense and Equipment
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) .........................1,836,869
Expense and Equipment
From State Court Administration Revolving Fund (1831) ...............................................60,000
Expense and Equipment
From Crime Victims’ Compensation Fund (1681) .............................................. 887,200
Total (Not to exceed 161.50 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$28,826,089
Section 12.315. To the Supreme Court
For funding court improvement projects and receiving grants and
contributions of funds from the federal government or from any
other source which may be deposited into the State Treasury for
use of the Supreme Court and other state courts, provided twenty-
five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between personal service
and expense and equipment, and further provided twenty-five
percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 12.300
through 12.380, excluding Sections 12.325 and 12.375

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 15
Personal Service .............................................................................................$3,087,331
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,615,733
From Judiciary – Federal Fund (1137) ........................................................................8,703,064
Personal Service ..................................................................................................121,609
Expense and Equipment ..........................................................................................4,866
Program Specific Distribution ................................................................. 5,000,000
From Basic Civil Legal Services Fund (1757) .................................................... 5,126,475
Total (Not to exceed 48.25 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$13,829,539
Section 12.320. To the Supreme Court
For funding the development and implementation of a program of
statewide court automation, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 12.300 through 12.380,
excluding Sections 12.325 and 12.375
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,001,174
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,290,764
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,635,801
From Statewide Court Automation Fund (1270) ................................................. 8,926,565
Total (Not to exceed 46.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$10,927,739
Section 12.325. To the Supreme Court
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Judiciary Education and Training Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,141,826
Section 12.330. To the Supreme Court
For Judicial Education and Training, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 12.300 through 12.380,
excluding Sections 12.325 and 12.375
Personal Service ................................................................................................$783,689
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 885,377
From Judiciary Education and Training Fund (1847) ..................................................1,669,066

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 16
Expense and Equipment
From Judiciary – Federal Fund (1137) ................................................................ 229,911
Total (Not to exceed 11.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,898,977
Section 12.335. To the Supreme Court
For funding the three (3) Courts of Appeals, provided twenty-five
percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 12.300 through
12.380, excluding Sections 12.325 and 12.375
Personal Service .............................................................................................$8,571,609
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,271,908
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 135.85 F.T.E.) ........................$9,843,517
Section 12.340. To the Supreme Court
For the salaries of Appeals Court Judges
Personal Service .............................................................................................$5,692,838
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 476.405,
RSMo ....................................................................................................... 102,784
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 32.00.00 F.T.E.) .....................$5,795,622
Section 12.345. To the Supreme Court
For funding the Circuit Courts, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 12.300 through 12.380,
excluding Sections 12.325 and 12.375
Personal Service .........................................................................................$125,014,050
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 476.405,
RSMo ....................................................................................................................89,331
Expense and Equipment (including $78,329 one-time) ........................... 5,195,634
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................130,299,015
Personal Service ...............................................................................................5,141,859
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,832,309
From Judiciary – Federal Fund (1137) ........................................................................6,974,168
Personal Service ..................................................................................................363,368
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 128,039
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ......................................................491,407

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 17
For the expungement of records in accordance with Section 2 of Article
XIV of the Constitution of Missouri
Personal Service
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) ............................102,861
Expense and Equipment
From State Court Administration Revolving Fund (1831) .............................................170,000
For the payment to counties for salaries of juvenile court personnel as
provided by the formula in Sections 211.393 and 211.394, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................17,767,376
For initiatives to improve and ensure high-quality legal representation
for children and families impacted by the child welfare and
justice system in foster care cases and abuse and neglect cases,
including a pilot program established by the Supreme Court of
Missouri in three circuits within the state, with one in a rural
circuit, one in a suburban circuit, and one in an urban
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................750,000
For renovations or improvements at a courthouse located in any city with
more than one hundred sixty thousand but fewer than two
hundred thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................1,100,000
For technology improvements and upgrades for a courthouse located in
any city not within a county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................3,500,000
For making payments due from litigants in court proceedings under set-
off against debts authority as provided in Section 488.020(3),
RSMo
From Circuit Courts Escrow Fund (1718) ........................................................... 4,079,958
Total (Not to exceed 2,617.70 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$165,234,785
Section 12.350. To the Supreme Court
For the salaries of the Circuit Court Judges, Associate Circuit Court
Judges, Senior Judges, Probate Commissioners, Deputy Probate
Commissioners, Treatment Court Commissioners, and Family

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 18
Court Commissioners, provided that the additional circuit judge
added in the twenty-fourth circuit shall serve until January 1,
2031, upon the appointment of the Governor and such judgeship
shall have an election in 2030 and every six years thereafter
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$64,814,612
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 476.405,
RSMo ....................................................................................................... 1,031,478
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 406.00 F.T.E.) ......................$65,846,090
Section 12.355. To the Supreme Court
For funding the court-appointed special advocacy program statewide
office
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,240,000
For capital improvement projects or capacity-building grants to serve
more children for the statewide court-appointed special advocacy
programs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................3,000,000
For a not-for-profit for a one-time capital funding project that recruits,
trains, and supports community volunteers who provide
advocacy for children located in a city with more than one
hundred twenty-five thousand but fewer than one hundred thirty-
five thousand inhabitants and a county with no less than one
hundred eighty-five thousand but fewer than one hundred ninety-
five thousand, provide that local matching funds must be
provided on a 50/50 state/local match rate in order to be eligible
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................500,000
For funding court-appointed special advocacy programs as provided in
Section 476.777, RSMo
From Missouri CASA Fund (1590) ..................................................................... 100,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,840,000
Section 12.360. To the Supreme Court
For funding costs associated with creating the handbook and other
programs as provided in Section 452.554
From Domestic Relations Resolution Fund (1852) ......................................................$300,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 19
Section 12.365. To the Commission on Retirement, Removal, and
Discipline of Judges
For funding the expenses of the Commission, provided twenty-five
percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 12.300 through
12.380, excluding Sections 12.325 and 12.375
Personal Service ................................................................................................$365,244
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 43,669
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 2.75 F.T.E.) ...............................$408,913
Section 12.370. To the Supreme Court
For funding the expenses of the members of the Appellate Judicial
Commission and the several circuit judicial commissions in
circuits having the non-partisan court plan, and for services
rendered by clerks of the Supreme Court, courts of appeals, and
clerks in circuits having the non-partisan court plan for giving
notice of and conducting elections as ordered by the Supreme
Court, provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 12.300 through 12.380, excluding Sections
12.325 and 12.375
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................$7,913
Section 12.375. To the Supreme Court
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Treatment Court Resources Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$10,354,212
Section 12.380. To the Supreme Court
For funding treatment courts, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment
Personal Service ................................................................................................$402,934
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,580,094
From Treatment Court Resources Fund (1733) .........................................................10,983,028
For funding treatment court programs focused on Missourians with
substance use, mental health, or co-occurring disorders related to
alcohol, opioid, and methamphetamine addiction, provided that

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 20
funds may be used for, but are not limited to, medication assisted
treatment, counseling, transportation, and drug testing, pursuant
to agreements between the Treatment Courts Coordinating
Commission and adult treatment courts, DWI courts, veterans
courts, mental health courts, and other treatment courts of this
state, and further provided that the Treatment Courts
Coordinating Commission shall submit an annual report to both
the Chairperson of the House Budget Committee and the
Chairperson of the Senate Appropriations Committee that
includes information concerning the contracts entered into and
the impact of the treatment court programs on rates of recidivism
Expense and Equipment
From Treatment Court Resources Fund (1733) ...........................................................1,000,000
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .......................... 250,000
Total (Not to exceed 6.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$12,233,028
Section 12.400. To the Office of the State Public Defender
For funding the State Public Defender System
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$59,973,209
For payment of expenses as provided by Chapter 600, RSMo, associated
with the defense of violent crimes and/or the contracting of
criminal representation with entities outside of the Missouri
Public Defender System
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,742,263
Expense and Equipment, provided that five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between other funds
From Public Defender Reinvestment Fund (1641) ......................................................9,101,104
For contracting fees and travel expenses in an effort to increase services
in underserved areas, provided that five percent (5%) flexibility
is allowed between other funds
Expense and Equipment
From Public Defender Reinvestment Fund (1641) ......................................................3,000,000
For funding computer equipment upgrades and information technology
security enhancements, provided that five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between other funds

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 21
Expense and Equipment
From Public Defender Reinvestment Fund (1641) (one-time) ....................................2,000,000
For holistic defense services that provide public defender clients access
to community services in an effort to reintegrate clients into their
communities, provided that five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between other funds
From Public Defender Reinvestment Fund (1641) ......................................................1,163,040
For expenses authorized by the Public Defender Commission as provided
by Section 600.090, RSMo
Personal Service ..................................................................................................185,465
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,395,916
From Legal Defense and Defender Fund (1670) .........................................................3,581,381
For refunds set-off against debts as required by Section 143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) .......................................................................2,450,000
For all grants and contributions of funds from the federal government or
from any other source which may be deposited in the State
Treasury for the use of the Office of the State Public Defender
From Office of the State Public Defender – Federal Fund (1112) ...................... 1,125,849
Total (Not to exceed 716.13 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$87,136,846
Section 12.500. To the Senate
Salaries of Members ......................................................................................$1,426,575
Mileage of Members ...........................................................................................140,358
Members' Per Diem ............................................................................................343,754
Senate Contingent Expenses ..........................................................................14,666,846
Joint Contingent Expenses ....................................................................... 325,425
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................16,902,958
Senate Contingent Expenses
From Senate Revolving Fund (1535) ................................................................... 40,000
Total (Not to exceed 221.54 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$16,942,958
Section 12.505. To the House of Representatives
Salaries of Members ......................................................................................$6,819,245
Mileage of Members ...........................................................................................691,946
Members’ Per Diem .........................................................................................1,856,896

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 22
Representatives’ Expense Vouchers ................................................................1,747,256
House Contingent Expenses .................................................................... 18,842,499
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................29,957,842
House Contingent Expenses
From House of Representatives Revolving Fund (1520) .................................... 45,000
Total (Not to exceed 436.38 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$30,002,842
Section 12.510. To the House of Representatives
For payment of organizational dues
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$294,631
Section 12.515. To the Committee on Legislative Research
For payment of expenses of members, salaries and expenses of
employees, and other necessary operating expenses
For the Legislative Research Administration ...............................................................$636,269
For the Oversight Division................................................................................... 1,741,957
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 26.00 F.T.E.) ..........................$2,378,226
Section 12.520. To the Committee on Legislative Research
For paper, printing, binding, editing, proofreading, and other necessary
expenses of publishing the Supplement to the Revised Statutes of
the State of Missouri
From Statutory Revision Fund (1546) (Not to exceed 1.25 F.T.E.) .............................$310,400
Section 12.525. To the Joint Committees of the General Assembly
For the Joint Committee on Administrative Rules .......................................................$199,800
For the Joint Committee on Public Employee Retirement .............................................214,964
For the Joint Committee on Education ................................................................ 98,982
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 6.00 F.T.E.) ...............................$513,746
Section 12.530. To the Missouri State Capitol Commission
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Capitol Commission Fund
From Missouri State Capitol Commission Capitol Preservation Fund
(1202) (one-time) .......................................................................................$577,554,561
Section 12.535. To the Missouri State Capitol Commission
For renovation and repair of restrooms in the capitol building, as well as
repair and renovations to mechanical, electrical, and plumbing
systems in the capitol building

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 12 23
From Missouri State Capitol Commission Capitol Preservation Fund
(1202) (one-time) ...........................................................................................$4,000,000
Elected Officials Totals
General Revenue Fund (578.58 F.T.E.) .................................................................$179,251,095
Federal Funds (95.38 F.T.E.) .....................................................................................41,111,619
Other Funds (260.06 F.T.E.) ................................................................................ 105,187,505
Total (934.02 F.T.E.) .............................................................................................$325,550,219
Judiciary Totals
General Revenue Fund (3,355.30 F.T.E.) ..............................................................$287,245,408
Federal Funds (122.25 F.T.E.) ...................................................................................16,568,393
Other Funds (72.50 F.T.E.) .................................................................................. 18,408,792
Total (3,550.05 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................$322,222,593
Public Defender Totals
General Revenue Fund (694.13 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$64,715,472
Federal Funds (0.00 F.T.E.) .........................................................................................1,125,849
Other Funds (22.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................. 18,845,525
Total (716.13 F.T.E.) ...............................................................................................$84,686,846
General Assembly Totals
General Revenue Fund (689.92 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$50,047,403
Federal Funds (0.00 F.T.E.) .......................................................................................................0
Other Funds (1.25 F.T.E.) .................................................................................... 395,400
Total (691.17 F.T.E.) ...............................................................................................$50,442,803
